Tennessee, session 114, HB2262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 37, Chapter 1, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department of children's services must complete any investigation of a child
care agency involving allegations of child abuse within forty-five (45) days of
commencing the investigation, except for good cause shown. This section does not
apply to an investigation into allegations that an operator or employee of a child care
agency committed child abuse.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 37, Chapter 1, Part 6, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
The department of children's services must complete any investigation of a child
care agency involving allegations of child sexual abuse within forty-five (45) days of
commencing the investigation, except for good cause shown. This section does not
apply to an investigation into allegations that an operator or employee of a child care
agency committed child sexual abuse.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2262
011153
- 1 -